Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska86-403
Definitions, where found.

For purposes of the Nebraska Public Safety Communication System Act, the definitions found in sections 86-407 and 86-408 apply.

Laws 1999, LB 446, § 3;

R.S.1943, (1999), § 86-1805;

Laws 2002, LB 1105, § 210;

Laws 2002, LB 1211, § 16;

Laws 2005, LB 343, § 4.